District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

7-1305.07

Essential surgery in medical emergency.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 507, 25 DCR 5094
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 506(r), 42 DCR 3684
Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-249, § 5(e), 55 DCR 9206

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1967.
1973 Ed., § 6-1687.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 505(r) of Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 10-253, March 23, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1652).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Mentally Retarded Citizens Substitute Consent for Health Care Decisions and Emergency Care Definition Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-249, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4162).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a), (b) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-88, April 12, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 2839).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-221, April 3, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3463).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-64, February 27, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2274).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-241, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2754).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-98, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3618).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-245, March 17, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4121).

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(b) of Mentally Retarded Citizens Substitute Consent for Health Care Decisions and Emergency Care Definition Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-249, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4162).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(b) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-221, April 3, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3463).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(b) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-64, February 27, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2274).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(b) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-241, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2754).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(b) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-98, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3618).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(b) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-245, March 17, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4121).
Temporary Repeal of Section For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 4(d) of Health-Care Decisions for Persons with Mental Retardation and Developmental Disabilities Temporary Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-46, February 9, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 1454).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 4(e) of Health-Care Decisions for Persons with Mental Retardation and Developmental Disabilities Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-194, March 2, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 2492).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 4(e) of Health-Care Decisions for Persons with Mental Retardation and Developmental Disabilities Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-100, February 2, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 3407).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 505(r) of the Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-389, December 29, 1994, 42 DCR 197).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 402(f) of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-44, April 28, 1995, 42 DCR 2217) and § 506(r) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 402(g) of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-44, April 28, 1995, 42 DCR 2217) and § 506(t) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 506(s) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(a) of the Mentally Retarded Citizens Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-554, December 30, 1998, 45 DCR 566).
For temporary addition of § 6-1967.1, see § 3(b) of the Mentally Retarded Citizens Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-554, December 30, 1998, 45 DCR 566).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of the Mentally Retarded Citizens Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-56, April 16, 1999, 46 DCR 3858).
For temporary (90-day) addition of § 6-1967.1, see § 3(b) of the Mentally Retarded Citizens Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-56, April 16, 1999, 46 DCR 3858).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of the Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-202, December 1, 1999, 47 DCR 134).
For temporary (90-day) addition of § 6-1967.1, see § 3(b) of the Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-202, December 1, 1999, 47 DCR 134).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of the Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-285, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2033).
For temporary (90-day) addition of § 6-1967.1, see § 3(b) of the Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-285, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 203).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of the Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-455, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9415).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 7-1305.07a, see § 3(b) of the Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-455, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9415).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-3, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2251).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section § 7-1305.07a, see § 3(b) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-3, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2251).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-143, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9944).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section § 7-1305.07a, see § 3(b) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-143, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9944).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-246, January 28, 2002, 49 DCR 1040).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 7-1305.07a, see § 3(b) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-246, January 28, 2002, 49 DCR 1040).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-514, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10480).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 7-1305.07a, see § 3(b) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-514, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10480).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-602, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 684).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 7-1305.07a, see § 3(b) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-602, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 684).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-234, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10734).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3(b) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-234, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10734).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-359, February 19, 2004, 51 DCR 2578).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3(b) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-359, February 19, 2004, 51 DCR 2578).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted for Health Care Decisions Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-558, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10375).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3(b) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted for Health Care Decisions Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-558, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10375).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-6, January 19, 2005, 52 DCR 2683).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3(b) of Citizens with Mental Retardation Substituted Consent for Health Care Decisions Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-6, January 19, 2005, 52 DCR 2683).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 4(d) of Health-Care Decisions for Persons with Mental Retardation and Developmental Disabilities Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-190, October 28, 2005, 52 DCR 10021).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 4(d) of Health-Care Decisions for Persons with Mental Retardation and Development Disabilities Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-262, January 26, 2006, 53 DCR 795).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 4(e) of Health-Care Decisions for Persons with Developmental Disabilities Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-480, September 25, 2006, 53 DCR 7940).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 4(e) of Health-Care Decisions for Persons with Developmental Disabilities Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-566, December 19, 2006, 53 DCR 10272).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 4(e) of Health-Care Decisions for Persons with Developmental Disabilities Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-161, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10932).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 4(e) of Health-Care Decisions for Persons with Developmental Disabilities Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-245, January 23, 2008, 55 DCR 1230).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 5(e) of Health-Care Decisions for Persons with Developmental Disabilities Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-492, August 4, 2008, 55 DCR 9167).